Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB371.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 224.40-315 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No permit to construct or expand a municipal solid waste disposal facility shall be
accepted for processing by the cabinet unless the application contains a
determination from the governing body for the solid waste management area in
which the facility is or will be located concerning the consistency of the application
with the area solid waste management plan submitted under KRS 224.43-345(1)(a)
to (d) and (l) until January 1, 1993, and the entire plan after January 1, 1993. The
governing body for the area shall, within sixty (60) days of receipt of a written
request, make the determination after public notice and opportunity for public
comment and public hearing. For applications with a notice of intent filed prior to
February 26, 1991, the cabinet shall continue to process the application but no
permit shall be approved until the governing body for the solid waste management
area in which the facility is or will be located has made a determination in
accordance with this section.
(2) No permit to construct or expand a municipal solid waste disposal facility shall be
approved unless the applicant affirmatively demonstrates and the cabinet makes a
written finding in the preliminary determination made pursuant to KRS 224.40-
310(2) that the application conforms to and is consistent with all of the following:
(a) The capacity needs identified in the area solid waste management plan;
(b) Other elements of the area solid waste management plan, for permit
applications filed after approval of those elements;
(c) The statewide solid waste reduction and management plan, for permit
applications filed after completion of the plan; and
(d) Applicable zoning regulations adopted pursuant to KRS Chapter 100.
(3) If the cabinet approves a permit to construct or expand a municipal solid waste
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 2/5/2025 3:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1191
management facility after the governing body for the area has determined the
application to be inconsistent with the area solid waste management plan, as part of
the written finding the cabinet shall state in detail the reasons why it did not accept
the determination of the governing body for the area.
(4) For the purposes of this section, the term municipal solid waste disposal facility
includes, in addition to those facilities defined in KRS 224.1-010(14), any residual
or contained landfill or incinerator disposing of industrial solid waste for a fee, but
does not include a waste site or facility which is operated exclusively by a solid
waste generator on property owned by that[the] solid waste generator which
accepts only industrial solid waste generated on or adjacent to that property
by[from] the solid waste generator and any[or] industrial solid waste generated at
another facility owned and operated by the generator or wholly-owned subsidiary.
Section 2. KRS 224.43-345 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each area solid waste management plan shall be prepared in accordance with any
administrative regulations of the cabinet and shall be required to include the
following:
(a) Identification of the area that will be included in the plan;
(b) A demographic study of the planning area of current and projected
populations five (5), ten (10) and twenty (20) years in the future. A projection
of the amount and source of solid waste generated, collected, and requiring
disposal at municipal solid waste disposal facilities for each of these time
periods shall be provided;
(c) An inventory and description of all existing solid waste management facilities
and activities. The description shall include their identity, location, life
expectancies, ownership, cost to the users, and level of compliance with state
and federal laws. The description is not required to include any solid waste
management facility which is operated exclusively by a solid waste generator
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 2/5/2025 3:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1191
on property owned by the solid waste generator for the purpose of accepting
solid waste from the solid waste generator or waste generated at another
facility owned and operated by the generator or wholly owned subsidiary.
After commencement of operation by a solid waste generator of a solid waste
disposal facility which is permitted but not included in a solid waste
management plan, an amendment to a solid waste management plan shall be
required for any solid waste which is to be no longer disposed by the solid
waste generator in its own solid waste disposal facility;
(d) An estimate of the area's long-range needs for solid waste management and
facilities for five (5), ten (10), and twenty (20) years into the future;
(e) Identification and assessment of current and future solid waste management
problems faced by the area. List any deficiencies with existing solid waste
management facilities in meeting current and future area needs, and identify
opportunities for improvement;
(f) Outline short-term, mid-term, and long-term goals and objectives of the solid
waste management area. The goals and objectives shall be consistent with the
policies and goals set out in KRS 224.43-010;
(g) Based on the problems, needs, goals, and objectives previously identified,
identify alternative approaches to solid waste management and select the
optimal alternatives. Solid waste management activities and facilities to be
addressed include:
1. Identification of those regulations and ordinances which provide for
proper, safe, and sanitary management of solid waste;
2. A description of proposed improvements to existing solid waste
collection and transportation systems necessary to achieve universal
collection;
3. Establishment of a siting procedure and development program to assure
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 2/5/2025 3:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1191
the orderly location, development, and financing of new or expanded
municipal solid waste management facilities. The plan shall demonstrate
how all persons in the planning area will within the near future have
reasonable opportunity to dispose of their waste in a manner that
complies with state and federal laws;
4. Identification of planned programs for the control and cleanup of litter
and open dumps. The programs shall include: identification of an
approved schedule for the cleanup of open dumps in existence as of
October 1, 2002; an annual survey of the planning area to discover new
open dumps which shall then be scheduled for cleanup within one (1)
year unless the cabinet approves a longer schedule; measures to prevent
the recurrence of dumping at sites which are cleaned up; cleanup of litter
along public roads three (3) times per year; and cleanup of litter along
city streets two (2) times per year. In these public road cleanups and also
open dump cleanups, nonviolent misdemeanant and Class D felon
inmate laborers may be used. A county that does not receive in any year
an allocation from the Kentucky pride fund sufficient to complete the
number of road cleanups provided for in this section shall not be deemed
out of compliance;
5. An assessment of opportunities to reduce the need for land disposal by
banning grass clippings, leaves, and other yard wastes from municipal
solid waste disposal facilities and the institution of composting
operations for grass clippings, leaves, and other yard wastes;
6. Establishment of a plan to reduce the need for land disposal through
waste reduction and recycling, materials recovery, and energy recovery
and the provision of opportunities for recycling that may include, but are
not limited to, drop-off centers or door-to-door collection. Where
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 2/5/2025 3:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1191
recycling or material recovery is not deemed feasible, specific factual
analysis shall be provided to support the conclusion; and
7. A description of any proposed recycling, materials recovery, or energy
recovery plan or facility;
(h) A five (5) year schedule and description of activities to be undertaken to
implement the proposed plan;
(i) A description of short-term costs of the plan including capital and operational
costs for each element of the plan, and the identification of the means of
financing plan implementation;
(j) Designation of the governing body for implementation of the solid waste
management plan or components of the plan. A description of its
responsibilities and authority shall be provided;
(k) A description of proposed surveillance and enforcement procedures to assure
that solid waste in the planning area is properly managed. Identification of
modifications to local laws and regulations necessary to implement the area
plan;
(l) Specific provisions to assure that adequate capacity for a ten (10) year period
shall be available for municipal solid waste generated in the solid waste
management area, and identification of any additional capacity authorized for
disposal of out-of-area municipal solid waste;
(m) A description of any capacity authorized for disposal of industrial solid
waste generated in or out-of-area at a municipal solid waste management
facility, as prescribed in subsection (4) of Section 1 of this Act;
(n) Contractual agreements for use of waste disposal capacity at any municipal
solid waste disposal facility inside or outside the waste management area
identified and relied upon in the plan;
(o)[(n)] Provisions to assure achievement of the policies and goals of KRS
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 2/5/2025 3:32 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1191
224.43-010; and
(p)[(o)] Establishment of a public information and participation process
including the following components:
1. Formation of an advisory committee composed of local residents;
business and industry representatives; and, with respect to collection of
solid waste, representatives of any city that is located within the solid
waste management area, is not a designated city as defined in KRS
224.43-315(9), and is not located within a county containing a
consolidated local government;
2. Preparation of a draft plan for public notice and comment;
3. Convening of a public hearing upon request; and
4. Publication of a response to public comments.
(2) A solid waste management plan complying with subsection (1) of this section shall
be submitted to the cabinet by October 1, 2002, and updated every five (5) years
thereafter. The cabinet shall make its determination approving or disapproving a
plan within one hundred twenty (120) days of receipt. A plan on which the cabinet
has not yet made a determination shall remain in effect until the determination is
made.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 2/5/2025 3:32 PM Jacketed